Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.370

Annexation—Transfer of fire department employees—Notice—Time limitation.

If, as a result of annexation of two or more cities, or code cities any employee is laid off who is eligible to transfer to the city, code city or town fire department under this section and RCW 35.10.360 and 35.10.365 the fire department shall notify the employee of the right to transfer and the employee shall have ninety days to transfer employment to the annexing city or code city fire department.

[ 1986 c 254 s 6.]